Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2278.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ban on the Exclusive Use of Digital Coupons Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Consumer." An individual who purchases grocery items for personal, family or household use at a store."Digital coupon." A coupon, rebate or similar instrument that is offered to the public through the Internet or another electronic method."Grocery items." Food, nondurable goods and household 123456789101112131415161718 supplies."Store." A supermarket, warehouse club or similar retail establishment that sells grocery items to consumers."Store card." A loyalty card, membership card or similar card or other instrument that is used by a consumer and that:(1) is issued by a store following application by the consumer;(2) is made available to the consumer either digitally or in person at the store; and(3) confers certain benefits to the consumer, including discount prices upon presentation of the card or instrument.Section 3. Paper coupons.(a) Availability.--A store that offers a digital coupon for a grocery item shall also make available to a consumer a paper coupon for the grocery item.(b) Value.--A paper coupon under subsection (a) for a grocery item must be identical in value to the digital coupon for the grocery item.(c) Location.--(1) A store shall make a paper coupon for a grocery item easily accessible at the service desk of the store.(2) In addition to the placement of a paper coupon for a grocery item at its service desk, a store may also place the paper coupon at other locations around the store.Section 4. Applying digital coupons to purchases.(a) Consumers generally.--Upon presenting a store card to a cashier or customer service representative at a store, a consumer may request that any applicable digital coupons be applied to the purchases of the consumer. If the store offers digital coupons, the cashier or customer service representative 20260HB2278PN2980 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall, at the time of sale, apply all applicable digital coupons to the purchases of the consumer.(b) Consumers who are 65 years of age or older.--If a consumer who is 65 years of age or older presents a store card to a cashier or customer service representative at a store, the store shall, at the time of sale, automatically apply all applicable digital coupons to the purchases of the consumer. The cashier or customer service representative may request that the consumer present a government-issued photo identification to verify the age of the consumer.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2278PN2980 - 3 - 123456789101112